apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzœ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="distàncies">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>km</l>
          <r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
        <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
        <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z\-]+)+)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="personas">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][a-zë]+ Le [A-Z][a-zë]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>monsieur<b/></l>
          <r>monsieur<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>madame<b/></l>
          <r>madame<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mademoiselle<b/></l>
          <r>mademoiselle<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Mlle</l>
          <r>Mlle</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Mlles</l>
          <r>Mlles</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Mme</l>
          <r>Mme</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Mmes</l>
          <r>Mmes</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>MM</l>
          <r>MM</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fechas">
      <e>
        <re>1</re>
        <p>
          <l>ère</l>
          <r>ère<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="horas">
      <e>
        <re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>h<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anys">
      <e>
        <re>[MCDXLVI]*</re>
        <p>
          <l>ème</l>
          <r>ème<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z]+([A-Z])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][0-9]+([0-9])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    
    
    	  
	  
  <pardef n="det2loc__np">
	<e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>
	<e r="RL"><p><l><a/>le<b/></l><r/></p></e>
  </pardef>

	  
  <pardef n="det3loc__np">
	<e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>
	<e r="RL"><p><l><a/>la<b/></l><r/></p></e>
  </pardef>

	  
  <pardef n="det4loc__np">
	<e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>
	<e r="RL"><p><l>les<b/></l><r/></p></e>
  </pardef>

    
    
    
    <pardef n="/auquel__rel">
            
<e><p><l>auquel</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>lequel<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>auxquelles</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>lequel<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>auxquels</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>lequel<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>à<b/>laquelle</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>lequel<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="auquel"><par n="/auquel__rel"/></e>
<e><par n="personas"/></e>
<e><par n="horas"/></e>
<e><par n="fechas"/></e>
<e><par n="urls"/></e>
<e><par n="emails"/></e>
<e><par n="distàncies"/></e>
<e><par n="anys"/></e>
<e><par n="acronimos"/></e>
